Mississippi, session 2026, HB1052.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Board on Law Enforcement Officer Standards and Training shall promulgate regulations to require all accredited law enforcement officers' training academies in the State of Mississippi to provide education and training components on the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and the United States Constitution to consist of not less than eight (8) hours in the initial law enforcement officer certification program and not less than two (2) hours in any required continuing education program for law enforcement officers.  The constitutional component will train officers to exercise the responsibilities of their policing authority within the parameters of the state and federal constitutions and federal and state court decisions, which together define the roles and responsibilities of law enforcement agencies and personnel in terms of everyday practices through constitutional decision-making, which further provides a framework to ensure fair, impartial and effective law enforcement consistent with constitutional principles, democratic values and community expectations, specifically regarding citizens rights under the Fourth, Fifth, Sixth, Eighth and Fourteenth amendments to the United States Constitution. SECTION 2.  Section 45-6-7, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 45-6-7.  In addition to the powers conferred upon the board elsewhere in this chapter, the board shall have power to: (a)  Promulgate rules and regulations for the administration of this chapter, including the authority to require the submission of reports and information by law enforcement agencies of the state and its political subdivisions. (b)  Establish minimum educational and training standards for admission to employment or appointment as a law enforcement officer or a part-time law enforcement officer:  (i) in a permanent position; and (ii) in a probationary status.  The minimum educational and training standards for any law enforcement officer assigned to field or investigative duties shall include at least two (2) hours of training related to handling complaints of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation of children as defined in Section 43-21-105, communicating with such victims, and requiring the officer to contact the Department of Child Protection Services when human trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation is suspected. (c)  Certify persons as being qualified under the provisions of this chapter to be law enforcement officers or part-time law enforcement officers. (d)  Revoke certification for cause and in the manner provided in this chapter.  The board is authorized to conduct investigations and subpoena documents regarding revocations.  The board shall maintain a current list of all persons certified under this chapter who have been placed on probation, suspended, subjected to revocation of certification, or any combination of these.  The board may establish a hearing panel for the purpose of providing a hearing to any law enforcement officer for whom the board believes there is a basis for reprimand, suspension, cancellation of, or recalling the certification of a law enforcement officer.  The hearing panel shall provide its written findings and recommendations to the board. (e)  Establish minimum curriculum requirements for basic and advanced courses and programs for schools operated by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training police and other law enforcement officers, both full- and part-time, which shall include a minimum of two (2) hours of training in a course or courses related to the identification of and support for victims of human trafficking and commercial sexual exploitation and eight (8) hours of training on the Mississippi Constitution of 1890 and the United States Constitution. (f)  Consult and cooperate with counties, municipalities, state agencies, other governmental agencies, and with universities, colleges, community and junior colleges and other institutions concerning the development of training schools, programs or courses of instruction for personnel defined in this chapter. (g)  Make recommendations concerning any matter within its purview pursuant to this chapter. (h)  Make such inspection and evaluation as may be necessary to determine if governmental units are complying with the provisions of this chapter. (i)  Approve law enforcement officer training schools for operation by or for the state or any political subdivision thereof for the specific purpose of training personnel defined in this chapter. (j)  Upon the request of agencies employing personnel defined in this chapter, conduct surveys or aid municipalities and counties to conduct surveys through qualified public or private agencies and assist in the implementation of any recommendations resulting from such surveys. (k)  Upon request of agencies within the purview of this chapter, conduct general and specific management surveys and studies of the operations of the requesting agencies at no cost to those agencies.  The role of the board under this subsection shall be that of management consultant. (l)  Adopt and amend regulations consistent with law, for its internal management and control of board programs. (m)  Enter into contracts or do such things as may be necessary and incidental to the administration of this chapter. (n)  Establish jointly with the State Board of Education the minimum level of basic law enforcement training required of persons employed by school districts as school security guards, or school resource officers or in other positions that have the powers of a peace officer. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.